Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1304.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 8510(a) and (b) of Title 24 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes are amended to read:§ 8510. Stress test of system.(a) General rule.--The board shall conduct an annual stress test of the system and submit the results of the stress test to the Governor, the General Assembly and the Independent Fiscal Office no later than [January] April 1 of each year. The stress test shall include a scenario analysis, simulation analysis and sensitivity analysis. The board shall disclose in the report of the stress test results which industry standards were used and whether any changes to industry standards have been made.(b) Report by Independent Fiscal Office.--No later than 1234567891011121314151617181920 [March] June 1 of each year, the Independent Fiscal Office shall produce a report summarizing the results of the stress test, including a calculation of the ratio of projected employer pension contributions to projected State revenues under a scenario analysis.* * *Section 2. Section 5909(a) and (b) of Title 71 are amended to read:§ 5909. Stress test of system.(a) General rule.--The board shall conduct an annual stress test of the system and submit the results of the stress test to the Governor, the General Assembly and the Independent Fiscal Office no later than [July 1] October 1 of each year. The stress test shall include a scenario analysis, simulation analysis and sensitivity analysis. The board shall disclose in the report of the stress test results which industry standards were used and whether any changes to industry standards have been made.(b) Report by Independent Fiscal Office.--No later than [September 1] December 1 of each year, the Independent Fiscal Office shall produce a report summarizing the results of the stress test, including a calculation of the ratio of projected employer pension contributions to projected State revenues under a scenario analysis.* * *Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1304PN1498 - 2 - 12345678910111213141516171819202122232425